Utah statutes.
38-1a-204.   Notification of filings with the registry.

(1)  The designated agent shall provide notification of the filing of a required notice relating to an anticipated improvement or construction project to:

(a)  the person filing the required notice, unless the person indicates to the division or designated agent that the person does not want to receive notification; and

(b)  each person who requests notification of the filing of a required notice for that anticipated improvement or construction project.

(2) (a)  A person may request the designated agent to provide the person notification of the filing of a required notice for any anticipated improvement or construction project.

(b)  A person requesting notification under Subsection (2)(a) is responsible:

(i)  to provide an email address, mailing address, or telefax number to which notification may be sent; and

(ii)  for the accuracy of the email address, mailing address, or telefax number.

(c)  A person is considered to have requested notification under Subsection (2)(a) if the person files, with respect to the same anticipated improvement or construction project that relates to the required notice that is the subject of the notification:

(i)  a notice of retention;

(ii)  a notice of commencement;

(iii)  a preliminary notice;

(iv)  a notice of construction loan; or

(v)  a notice of completion.

(3)  The designated agent fulfills the notification requirement under Subsection (1) by sending the notification to the email address, mailing address, or telefax number that the person provides to the designated agent, whether or not the person actually receives the notification.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

